Tennessee statutes. Title 60 Oil And Gas
Part 1

General Provisions

60-1-101. Chapter definitions. [See contingent amendment to subdivision (1) and the Compiler’s Notes.]

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

[Current version. See second version for contingent amendment and Compiler's Notes.]

“Board” means the Tennessee board of water quality, oil and gas created by § 69-3-104;

[Contingent amendment. See the Compiler's Notes.]

“Casinghead gas” means any gas or vapor, or both, indigenous to an oil stratum and produced from such stratum with oil. It shall be treated as gas, if sold, for the purpose of paying privilege tax;

“Condensate” means liquid hydrocarbons that were in the gaseous phase in the reservoir in initial reservoir conditions. It shall be treated as oil for the purpose of paying privilege tax;

“Field” means the general area which is underlain or appears to be underlain by at least one pool and including the pool or pools beneath the area;

“Gas” means all natural gas and all other fluid hydrocarbons not defined as oil, including condensate because it originally was in a gaseous phase in the reservoir;

“Oil” means crude petroleum that was originally in an oil phase in the reservoir;

“Operator” means any person who owns or is directly responsible for a business involved in some phase of the production, manufacture, refining or distribution of petroleum oil or natural gas;

“Owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and to produce from any pool, and to appropriate the production for such person or others;

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary or representative of any kind;

“Pool” means an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of crude petroleum oil or natural gas or both. Each zone of the general structure which is completely separated from any other zone in the structure is covered by the term “pool” as used in this chapter;

“Producer” means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas, or both, in paying quantities;

“Supervisor” means the commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's designee; and

“Waste,” in addition to its ordinary meaning, means “physical waste” as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry. It includes:

Underground waste and inefficient, excessive, or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy, including gas energy and water drive, of any pool; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil well or gas ultimately recoverable from any pool; and

Surface waste and the inefficient storing of oil and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of oil wells or gas wells in a manner causing or tending to cause unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas.

“Board” means the Tennessee board of energy and natural resources, created by § 69-3-104;

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.3; Acts 1971, ch. 280, § 1; 1978, ch. 791, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-101; Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 21; 2012, ch. 986, § 29; 2018, ch. 839, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 44 provided that the governor shall take all action necessary to prepare and submit for approval all necessary requests for federal grant funding and applications for authorization to the appropriate federal authority to obtain exclusive jurisdiction over surface coal mining and reclamation operations and the maximum federal money available for those purposes in an expeditious manner.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 45 provided that the commissioner of environment and conservation shall notify the secretary of state and the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the date this state has been approved to exercise primacy over the regulation of surface coal mining and reclamation operations within its territorial boundaries.

Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall take effect, including for purposes of rulemaking, upon the deposit of federal funds in the Coal Mining Protection Fund.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment rewrote the definition of “board” by substituting “board of energy and natural resources” for “board of water quality, oil, and gas”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 839, § 47. [See Compiler's Notes.]

Cross-References. Municipal corporations, oil and natural gas drilling authorized, § 6-54-110.

Natural resources trust fund, title 11, ch. 14, part 3.

Petroleum Trade Practices Act, §§ 47-25-601 — 47-25-607, 47-25-611.

Printed contract forms for products extracted from or beneath the earth, § 47-50-110.

Law Reviews.

Conservation of Oil and Gas in Tennessee (Phillip J. Sheehe), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 323.

Into the Fracking Fray: A Balanced Approach to Regulating Hydraulic Fracturing in Tennessee, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 667 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Providing natural gas within city limits. OAG 14-42, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 43 (4/1/14).

60-1-102. Waste prohibited.

The production or handling of crude petroleum oil or natural gas in such manner or under such conditions as to constitute or result in waste as defined in § 60-1-101 is each prohibited.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-102.

60-1-103. Permits — Applications — Operators' plans.

No person shall drill any well for oil or gas, or conduct any surface disturbances incidental to or in preparation for such drilling, until a permit application has been submitted to the supervisor. The supervisor shall not issue a permit until the conditions established by this subsection (a) have been met.

An application for a permit to drill shall be filed with the supervisor. The supervisor shall prescribe the form of the application.

The application shall include the exact location of the well, the name and address of the person or persons responsible for the drilling operations, the proposed depth of the well, the location of all existing or proposed roads providing access to the well site, and the location of all blue-line streams within one-half (½) mile of the well site or access roads.

The application shall also include a plan for erosion control prevention of pollution of surface waters, and reclamation of all areas disturbed by the operations, including access roads. The plan shall conform to the requirements of part 7 of this chapter. The plan must be sufficiently detailed to allow an inspector to locate the site of the facilities to be constructed and to estimate the expected environmental impact, but does not have to include detailed engineering design drawings.

No drilling shall begin until the permit has been approved.

A processing fee for permits shall be submitted with the application in an amount specified in rules promulgated by the board, which shall not exceed the amount stated in § 68-203-103(h) for an oil and gas permit.

All funds received by the commissioner under this chapter, except those under parts 3 and 4 of this chapter, together with any interest earned on the funds, shall be deposited into a separate account in the environmental protection fund created by § 68-203-101.

The supervisor may require or approve modifications in the operator's plan if such modifications are necessary to prevent pollution or to promote reclamation.

Upon approval, the operator's plan shall be a condition of the operator's permit. Failure to comply with the plan shall be grounds for revocation of the permit and forfeiture of the bond.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.5; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1978, ch. 791, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-111; Acts 1981, ch. 146, § 1; 1987, ch. 257, § 1; 2007, ch. 362, §§ 1-3; 2012, ch. 986, § 31.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

60-1-104. Records and reports of production and sales — False reports.

It is the duty of every person producing, selling, gathering, transporting, or storing crude petroleum or natural gas from any well or wells in this state to keep and preserve suitable records of the amount of all such crude petroleum or natural gas produced, sold, gathered, transported, or stored, and the price received and paid therefor.

Such person shall report such records to the oil and gas supervisor at such intervals as the board may direct and on forms provided by the supervisor.

Anyone who shall intentionally make or cause to be made any false entry or statement of fact in any report required to be made by this chapter, or by any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, or who for such purpose shall make or cause to be made any false entry in any account, record or memorandum kept by any person in connection with this chapter, or any rule, regulation or order made thereunder, or who for such purpose shall omit to make, or cause to be omitted, full, true and correct entries on such accounts, records or memoranda of all facts and transactions pertaining to the interest or activities in the oil and gas industry of such persons as may be required by the board under authority given in this chapter, or by any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, or who for such purpose shall remove out of the jurisdiction of the state, or mutilate, alter or by any other means falsify any book, record or other paper pertaining to the transactions regulated by this chapter, or by any rule, regulation or order made hereunder, is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1943, ch. 64, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 5240.11; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 60-112; Acts 1989, ch. 159, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

60-1-105. Requested status under federal law — Applications and fees.

Any person who files with the board an application requesting a determination by the board of whether natural gas produced from a well qualifies for a requested status under § 102, 103, 107 or 108 of the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, Public Law No. 95-621, 92 Stat. 3350 (including any act of congress which amends or supersedes those sections of that act) which determination the board is authorized to make under § 503 of that act, shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to the state treasurer through the supervisor at the time such application is filed. A separate fee shall be paid for each such application. All funds paid to the state treasurer pursuant to this section shall be disbursed by the state treasurer upon warrants drawn by the commissioner of finance and administration to defray expenses incurred in acting upon such Natural Gas Policy Act determinations.

Acts 1984, ch. 677, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 102, 103, 107, 108 and 503 of the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978, Public Law No. 95-621, 92 Stat. 3350, are codified as 15 U.S.C. §§ 3312, 3313, 3317, 3318, and 3413, respectively.

60-1-106. Spacing of oil wells.

Wells drilled in search of oil or gas to a depth of less than two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') shall not be located closer than four hundred feet (400') from any other well completed in, drilling to, or for which a permit shall have been granted to drill to the same pool. The distance of such oil and gas wells from any property line shall not be closer than two hundred feet (200').

This subsection (a) applies only in counties having a population of not less than seventeen thousand five hundred fifty (17,550) and not more than seventeen thousand six hundred fifty (17,650), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Wells drilled in search of oil and gas shall not be located closer than four hundred feet (400') from any other well completed in, drilling to, or for which a permit shall have been granted to drill to the same pool; and not closer than two hundred feet (200') from any property line.

This subsection (b) applies only in counties having a population of not less than four thousand three hundred (4,300) and not more than four thousand four hundred (4,400) or in counties having a population of not less than seven thousand six hundred fifty (7,650) nor more than seven thousand seven hundred (7,700), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1984, ch. 967, §§ 1-3; 1986, ch. 802, § 1; 1987, ch. 215, § 1; 1987, ch. 455, § 1; 1988, ch. 749, § 1; 1990, ch. 1018, § 1; 1990, ch. 1019, § 1; 1992, ch. 634, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.